Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB480.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1748.2-A. Full-time Cyber Education Program Offered by School District.--(a) Notwithstanding section 1725-A(a)(1) or any other provision of law to the contrary, the following shall apply to a student who resides in a school district that offers a full-time cyber education program:(1) If the student enrolls in the full-time cyber education program offered by the school district of residence, the student's enrollment in the cyber education program shall be 12345678910111213141516171819 subject to no tuition or fees other than fees that the school district imposes on its students generally.(2) If the student chooses to enroll in a cyber charter school, the student or the student's parent or guardian shall be responsible to pay the cyber charter school a per-student amount calculated in the manner provided under section 1725-A(a)(2) and (3). The payments shall be made to the cyber charter school in twelve (12) equal monthly payments, by the fifth day of each month, within the operating school year. A student enrolled in a cyber charter school under this clause shall not be included in the average daily membership of the student's school district of residence for the purpose of providing basic education funding payments and special education funding under Article XXV.(b) As used in this section, the term "full-time cyber education program" shall mean a complete course of study offered by a school district in which the school district uses technology in order to provide a significant portion of its curriculum and to deliver a significant portion of instruction to its students through the Internet or other electronic means, but not through a cyber charter school established under section 1745-A.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0480PN0463 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122